Utah statutes.
16-6a-608.   Resignation.

(1)  Unless otherwise provided by the bylaws, a member may resign at any time.

(2)  The resignation of a member does not relieve the member from any obligation or commitment the member may have to the nonprofit corporation incurred or made prior to resignation.



Enacted by Chapter 300, 2000 General Session

